Washington statutes.
RCW 16.65.430

Information and records available to director and news services.

Information and records of the licensee that are necessary for the compilation of adequate reports on the marketing of livestock shall be made available to the director or any news service, publishing or broadcasting such market reports.

[ 1959 c 107 s 43.]